Hawaii, session 2025, SB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that public transportation serves as an essential resource for mobility, employment, education, healthcare, and community engagement, benefiting residents and visitors alike. The inclusion of companion animals in public transportation can enhance accessibility, reduce barriers for pet owners in need, and promote the humane treatment of animals.  A survey of underserved areas conducted by the Hawaii Humane Society revealed that large portion of pet owners identified transportation limitations as a significant barrier to accessing veterinary care, pet-friendly housing, and other essential services. The legislature further finds that comparable policies in metropolitan areas such as Boston, New York City, and Washington, D.C., have demonstrated that accommodating pets on public transportation is feasible with proper limitations and oversight to ensure the safety and comfort of all riders. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow service animals and non-service pet animals on mass transit systems in the State. SECTION 2. Chapter 51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§51-    Animals on mass transit.  (a)  Service animals, as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act, shall be allowed on any mass transit vehicle at all times. (b) Non-service pet animals shall be allowed: (1)  During peak hours between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. and between the hours of 4:00 p.m. and 7:00 p.m.; provided that non-service pet animals shall be secured in an enclosed carrier that fits on the passenger's lap or under the seat without obstructing the aisles; and (2)  During off-peak hours; provided that larger dogs shall be securely leashed and not occupy seats or impede passenger movement. (c)  Pet animal owners shall ensure their pet animals are well-behaved, properly leashed or contained, and do not cause a disturbance or pose a risk to passengers. (d)  Any pet animal exhibiting aggressive or disruptive behavior shall result in the owner being asked to disembark. (e)  Transit personnel shall retain the authority to restrict pet animal access during emergencies, overcrowding, or other safety concerns. (f)  Pet animal owners shall assume liability for any damage or injury caused by their animal while using public transportation. (g) For the purposes of this section, "pet animal" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 711-1100." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________